Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.13.230

Duty to demand payment.

(1) A shareholder sent a notice described in RCW 23B.13.220 must demand payment, certify whether the shareholder acquired beneficial ownership of the shares before the date required to be set forth in the notice pursuant to RCW 23B.13.220(6)(c), and deposit the shareholder's certificates, all in accordance with the terms of the notice.

(2) The shareholder who demands payment and deposits the shareholder's share certificates under subsection (1) of this section retains all other rights of a shareholder until the proposed corporate action is effected.

(3) A shareholder who does not demand payment or deposit the shareholder's share certificates where required, each by the date set in the notice, is not entitled to payment for the shareholder's shares under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 42 s 117; 2013 c 97 s 3; 2002 c 297 s 39; 1989 c 165 s 146.]